Hawaii statutes.
§122A-8 Pay and allowances. (a) When
in the active service of the State, members of the Hawaii state defense force
shall receive from the State the same basic pay and allowance for subsistence
as prescribed by federal law and regulations for members of the army national
guard, of like grade and length of service, when in the active service of the
United States. Subject to rules adopted by the governor, members may be
subsisted in kind in lieu of a monetary allowance therefor.

(b) Subject to rules adopted by the governor,
members of the Hawaii state defense force when in the active service of the
State may be quartered at the expense of the State or paid a monetary allowance
in lieu thereof. [L 1987, c 35, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 135, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next